California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) The detention of a minor that occurs for the purpose of requesting a voluntary DNA reference sample directly from the person of that minor pursuant to this
 section shall not be unreasonably extended solely for the purpose of contacting a parent, legal guardian, or attorney pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), if a parent, legal guardian, or attorney cannot be reached after reasonable attempts have been made.

(d) The court shall, in adjudicating the admissibility of a voluntary DNA reference sample taken directly from a minor pursuant to this section, consider the effect of any failure to comply with this section.

(e) The law enforcement agency obtaining a voluntary DNA reference sample directly from the person of a minor pursuant to this section shall determine within two years whether the person remains a suspect in a criminal investigation. If, within two years, the voluntary DNA reference sample that is collected pursuant to this section is not found to implicate the minor as a suspect in a criminal offense, the local law
 enforcement agency shall promptly expunge the sample and the DNA profile information from that voluntary DNA reference sample from the databases or data banks into which they have been entered.

(f) If the minor requests expungement of a voluntary DNA reference sample collected directly from the person of a minor pursuant to this section, the local law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to promptly expunge the sample and the DNA profile information from that voluntary DNA reference sample from all DNA databases or data banks unless the voluntary DNA reference sample has implicated the minor as a suspect in a criminal investigation. If expungement occurs, law enforcement shall make reasonable efforts to notify the minor when the minor’s DNA sample and DNA profile information have been expunged.

(g) A voluntary DNA reference sample taken directly from the person of a
 minor pursuant to this section and the DNA profile information from that voluntary DNA reference sample shall not be searched, analyzed, or compared to DNA samples or profiles in the investigation of crimes other than the investigation or investigations for which it was taken, unless that additional use is permitted by a court order.

(h) Any local law enforcement agency that is found by clear and convincing evidence to maintain a pattern and practice of collecting voluntary DNA reference samples directly from the person of a minor in violation of this section after January 1, 2019, shall be liable to each minor whose sample was inappropriately collected in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, plus attorney’s fees and costs.

(i) The scope of this section is limited to the collection of voluntary DNA reference samples directly from the person of minors,
 and, as such, subdivisions (a) to (h), inclusive have no application to the collection and use of DNA under other circumstances, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) The sample collection or use is expressly authorized pursuant to the state’s DNA Act as set forth in the DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Data Bank Act of 1998, as amended, (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 295) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(2) A DNA reference sample collection and analysis that occurs pursuant to a valid search warrant or court order or exigent circumstances.

(3) A DNA reference sample collection that occurs in the investigation or identification of a missing or abducted minor.

(4) Any DNA reference sample collected from a
 juvenile victim or suspected perpetrator of a sexual assault or other crime as authorized by law.

(5) Any DNA sample that is collected as evidence in a criminal investigation, such as evidence from a crime scene or an abandoned sample.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 745, Sec. 1.   (AB 1584)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

625.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to accomplish the following purposes:

(1) To safeguard the fiscal integrity of cities and counties by enabling them to recoup the law enforcement costs of identifying, detaining, and transporting minors who violate curfew ordinances to their places of residence.

(2) To encourage parents and legal guardians to exercise reasonable care, supervision, and control over their minor children so as to prevent them from committing unlawful acts.

(3) To help eradicate criminal street gang activity.

(b) This section shall only apply to a city, county, or city and county in which the governing body of the city, county, or city and county has enacted an ordinance prohibiting minors from remaining in or upon the public streets unsupervised after hours and has adopted a resolution to implement this section.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), law enforcement personnel are authorized to temporarily detain any minor upon a reasonable suspicion based on articulable facts that the minor is in violation of the ordinance described in subdivision (b) and to transport that minor to his or her place of permanent or temporary residence within the state, whether the place of residence is located within or without the jurisdiction of the governing body, or to the custody of his or her parents or legal guardian. A law enforcement officer may decide not to temporarily detain and transport a minor if he or she determines that the minor has a legitimate reason based on extenuating circumstances for violating the ordinance.

(d) Upon the first violation of the ordinance described in subdivision (b), the law enforcement officer shall issue to the minor a warning citation regarding the consequences of a second violation of the ordinance. A designated representative of the governmental entity issuing the citation shall mail to the parents of the minor or legal guardian a notification that states that upon a second violation, the parents or legal guardian may be held liable for actual administrative and transportation costs, and that requires the parents or legal guardian to sign and return the notification. This notification shall include a space for the explanation of any circumstances relevant to an applicable exemption from the fee as provided by subdivision (e). This explanation shall be reviewed by a designated representative of the governmental entity that issued the citation and notification. If the explanation is found to be insufficient, the representative may request a consultation with the parents or legal guardian for the purpose of discussing the circumstances claimed to be relevant to an applicable exemption.

(e) A fee for the actual costs of administrative and transportation services for the return of the minor to his or her place of residence, or to the custody of his or her parents or legal guardian, may be charged jointly or severally to the minor, his or her parents, or legal guardian, in an amount not to exceed those actual costs. Upon petition of the person required to pay the fee, the governmental entity issuing the citation shall conduct a hearing as to the validity of the fees charged, and may waive payment of the fee by the minor, his or her parents, or legal guardian, upon a finding of good cause. If authorized by the governing body, the city, county, or city and county may charge this fee, in which case the city, county, or city and county may (1) provide for waiver of the payment of the fee by the parents or legal guardian upon a determination that the person has made reasonable efforts to exercise supervision and control over the minor, (2) provide for a determination of the ability to pay the fee and provide that the fee may be waived if neither the minor nor the parents or legal guardian has the ability to pay the fee, (3) provide for the performance of community service in lieu of imposition of the fee, and (4) provide for waiver of the payment of the fee by the parents or legal guardian upon a determination that the parents or legal guardian has limited physical or legal custody and control of the minor.

(f) In a civil action commenced by a city, county, or city and county to collect the fee, a court may waive payment of the fee by the minor, his or her parents, or legal guardian, upon a finding of good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

625.6.

(a) Prior to a custodial interrogation, and before the waiver of any Miranda rights, a youth 17 years of age or younger shall consult with legal counsel in person, by telephone, or by video conference. The consultation may not be waived.

(b) The court shall, in adjudicating the admissibility of statements of a youth 17 years of age or younger made during or after a custodial
 interrogation, consider the effect of failure to comply with subdivision (a) and, additionally, shall consider any willful violation of subdivision (a) in determining the credibility of a law enforcement officer under Section 780 of the Evidence Code.

(c) This section does not apply to the admissibility of statements of a youth 17 years of age or younger if both of the following criteria are met:

(1) The officer who questioned the youth reasonably believed the information
 the officer sought was necessary to protect life or property from an imminent threat.

(2) The officer’s questions were limited to those questions that were reasonably necessary to obtain that information.

(d) This section does not require a probation officer to comply with subdivision (a) in the normal performance of the probation officer’s duties under Section 625, 627.5, or 628.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 335, Sec. 2.   (SB 203)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

625.7.

(a) During a custodial interrogation of a person 17 years of age or younger relating to the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, a law enforcement officer shall not employ threats, physical harm, deception, or psychologically manipulative interrogation tactics.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Deception,” includes, but is not limited to, the knowing communication of false facts about evidence, misrepresenting the accuracy of the facts, or false statements regarding leniency.

(2) “Psychologically manipulative interrogation tactics” include, but are not limited to the following:

(A) Maximization and minimization and other interrogation practices that rely on a presumption of guilt or
 deceit.

(i) Under this section, maximization includes techniques to scare or intimidate the person by repetitively asserting the person is guilty despite their denials, or exaggerating the magnitude of the charges or the strength of the evidence, including suggesting the existence of evidence that does not exist.

(ii) Under this section, minimization involves minimizing the moral seriousness of the offense, a tactic that falsely communicates that the conduct is justified, excusable, or accidental.

(B) Making direct or indirect promises of leniency, such as indicating the person will be released if the person cooperates.

(C) Employing the “false” or “forced” choice strategy, where the person is encouraged to select one of two options, both incriminatory, but one is characterized as morally or legally justified or excusable.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to
 interrogations of a person 17 years of age or younger if both of the following criteria are met:

(1) The law enforcement officer who questioned the person reasonably believed the information the officer sought was necessary to protect life or property from an imminent threat.

(2) The questions by law enforcement officers were limited to those questions that were reasonably necessary to obtain information related to the imminent threat.

(d) This section does not prevent an officer from using a lie detector test as long it is voluntary and was not obtained through the use of threats, physical harm, deception, or psychologically manipulative interrogation tactics as defined herein, and the officer does not suggest that the lie detector results are admissible in court or misrepresent the lie detector results to the person.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “custodial interrogation” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 859.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.   (AB 2644)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

626.

An officer who takes a minor into temporary custody under the provisions of Section 625 may do any of the following:

(a) Release the minor.

(b) Deliver or refer the minor to a public or private agency with which the city or county has an agreement or plan to provide shelter care, counseling, or diversion services to minors so delivered. A placement of a child in a community care facility as specified in Section 1530.8 of the Health and Safety Code shall be made in accordance with Section 319.2 or 319.3, as applicable, and with paragraph (8) or (9) of subdivision (e) of Section 361.2, as applicable.

(c) Prepare in duplicate a written notice to appear before the probation officer of the county in which the minor was taken into custody at a time and place specified in the notice. The notice shall also contain a concise statement of the reasons the minor was taken into custody. The officer shall deliver one copy of the notice to the minor or to a parent, guardian, or responsible relative of the minor and may require the minor or the minor’s parent, guardian, or relative, or both, to sign a written promise to appear at the time and place designated in the notice. Upon the execution of the promise to appear, the officer shall immediately release the minor. The officer shall, as soon as practicable, file one copy of the notice with the probation officer. The written notice to appear may require that the minor be fingerprinted, photographed, or both, upon the minor’s appearance before the probation officer, if the minor is a person described in Section
 602 and he or she was taken into custody upon reasonable cause for the commission of a felony.

(d) Take the minor without unnecessary delay before the probation officer of the county in which the minor was taken into custody, or in which the minor resides, or in which the acts take place or the circumstances exist which are alleged to bring the minor within the provisions of Section 601 or 602, and deliver the custody of the minor to the probation officer. The peace officer shall prepare a concise written statement of the probable cause for taking the minor into temporary custody and the reasons the minor was taken into custody and shall provide the statement to the probation officer at the time the minor is delivered to the probation officer. In no case shall the officer delay the delivery of the minor to the probation officer for more than 24 hours if the minor has been taken into custody without a warrant on the belief that the minor has
 committed a misdemeanor.

In determining which disposition of the minor to make, the officer shall prefer the alternative which least restricts the minor’s freedom of movement, provided that alternative is compatible with the best interests of the minor and the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 21, Sec. 10.   (AB 74)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

626.5.

If an officer who takes a minor into temporary custody under the provisions of Section 625 determines that the minor should be brought to the attention of the juvenile court, he or she shall thereafter take one of the following actions:

(a) He or she may prepare in duplicate a written notice to appear before the probation officer of the county in which the minor was taken in custody at a time and place specified in the notice. The notice shall also contain a concise statement of the reasons the minor was taken into custody. The officer shall deliver one copy of the notice to the minor or to a parent, guardian, or responsible relative of the minor and may require the minor or his or her parent, guardian, or relative, or both, to sign a written promise that either or both will appear at the time and place designated in the notice. Upon the execution of the promise to appear, the officer shall immediately release the minor. The officer shall, as soon as practicable, file one copy of the notice with the probation officer.

(b) He or she may take the minor without unnecessary delay before the probation officer of the county in which the minor was taken into custody, or in which the minor resides, or in which the acts took place or the circumstances exist which are alleged to bring the minor within the provisions of Section 601 or 602, and deliver the custody of the minor to the probation officer. The peace officer shall prepare a concise written statement of the probable cause for taking the minor into temporary custody and the reasons the minor was taken into custody and shall provide that statement to the probation officer at the time the minor is delivered to the probation officer. In no case shall he or she delay the delivery of the minor to the probation officer for more than 24 hours if the minor has been taken into custody without a warrant on the belief that he or she has committed a misdemeanor.

In determining which disposition of the minor he or she will make, the officer shall prefer the alternative which least restricts the minor’s freedom of movement, provided that alternative is compatible with the best interests of the minor and the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 878, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

626.6.

Notwithstanding Section 626.5, any peace officer who takes a minor who is 14 years of age or older into temporary custody under Section 625.3 shall take the minor without unnecessary delay before the probation officer of the county in which the minor was taken into custody, or in which the minor resides, or in which the acts took place or the circumstances exist which are alleged to bring the minor within the provisions of Section 602, and deliver the custody of the minor to the probation officer. The peace officer shall prepare a concise written statement of the probable cause for taking the minor into temporary custody and the reasons the minor was taken into custody and shall provide that statement to the probation officer at the time the minor is delivered to the probation officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

626.8.

(a) Subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e) and subdivision (g) of Section 859.5 of the Penal Code shall apply to any custodial interrogation of a person who is or who may be adjudged a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602 related to murder, as listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 707.

(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), Article 22 (commencing with Section 825) shall apply to any electronic recording or other record made pursuant to this section.

(2) The interrogating entity shall maintain an original or exact copy of any electronic
 recording made of a custodial interrogation until the person is no longer subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, unless the person is transferred to a court of criminal jurisdiction. If the person is transferred to a court of criminal jurisdiction, subdivision (f) of Section 859.5 of the Penal Code shall apply. The interrogating entity may make one or more true, accurate, and complete copies of the electronic recording in a different format.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 799, Sec. 3.   (SB 569)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

627.

(a) When an officer takes a minor before a probation officer at a juvenile hall or to any other place of confinement pursuant to this article, the officer shall take immediate steps to notify the minor’s parent, guardian, or a responsible relative that such minor is in custody and the place where the minor is being held.

(b) Immediately after being taken to a place of confinement pursuant to this article and, except where physically impossible, no later than one hour after the minor has been taken into custody, the minor shall be advised and has the right to make at least two telephone calls from the place where the minor is being held, one call
 completed to the minor’s parent or guardian, a responsible relative, or their employer, and another call completed to an attorney. The calls shall be at public expense, if the calls are completed to telephone numbers within the local calling area, and in the presence of a public officer or employee. Any public officer or employee who willfully deprives a minor taken into custody of their right to make such telephone calls is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Immediately after being taken to a place of confinement pursuant to this article, and no later than two hours after a minor has been taken into custody, the probation officer shall immediately notify the public defender or if there is no public defender, the indigent defense provider for the county, that the minor has been taken into custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 289, Sec. 2.   (AB 2644)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

627.5.

In any case where a minor is taken before a probation officer pursuant to the provisions of Section 626 and it is alleged that such minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602, the probation officer shall immediately advise the minor and his parent or guardian that anything the minor says can be used against him and shall advise them of the minor’s constitutional rights, including his right to remain silent, his right to have counsel present during any interrogation, and his right to have counsel appointed if he is unable to afford counsel. If the minor or his parent or guardian requests counsel, the probation officer shall notify the judge of the juvenile court of such request and counsel for the minor shall be appointed pursuant to Section 634.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

628.

(a) (1) Upon delivery to the probation officer of a minor who has been taken into temporary custody under the provisions of this article, the probation officer shall immediately investigate the circumstances of the minor and the facts surrounding their being taken into custody and shall immediately release the minor to the custody of their parent, legal guardian, or responsible relative unless it can be demonstrated upon the evidence before the court that continuance in the home is contrary to the minor’s welfare and one or more of the following conditions exist:

(A) Continued detention of the minor is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the
 minor or reasonable necessity for the protection of the person or property of another.

(B) The minor is likely to flee the jurisdiction of the court.

(C) The minor has violated an order of the juvenile court.

(2) The probation officer’s decision to detain a minor who is currently a dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 or the subject of a petition to declare the minor a dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 and who has been removed from the custody of their parent or guardian by the juvenile court shall not be based on any of the following:

(A) The minor’s status as a dependent of the juvenile court or as the subject of a petition to
 declare the minor a dependent of the juvenile court.

(B) A determination that continuance in the minor’s current placement is contrary to the minor’s welfare.

(C) The child welfare services department’s inability to provide a placement for the minor.

(3) The probation officer shall immediately release a minor described in paragraph (2) to the custody of the child welfare services department or the minor’s current foster parent or other caregiver unless the probation officer determines that one or more of the conditions in paragraph (1) exist.

(4) This section does not limit a probation officer’s authority to refer a minor to child welfare services.

(b) If the probation officer has reason to believe that the minor is at risk of entering foster care placement, as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4, the probation officer shall, as part of the investigation undertaken pursuant to subdivision (a), make reasonable efforts, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4, to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the minor from their home.

(c) In any case in which there is reasonable cause for believing that a minor who is under the care of a physician or surgeon or a hospital, clinic, or other medical facility and cannot be immediately moved is a person described in subdivision (d) of Section 300, the minor shall be deemed to have been taken into temporary custody and
 delivered to the probation officer for the purposes of this chapter while the minor is at the office of the physician or surgeon or that medical facility.

(d) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that this subdivision shall comply with paragraph (29) of subsection (a) of Section 671 of Title 42 of the United States Code as added by the Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351). It is further the intent of the Legislature that the identification and notification of relatives shall be made as early as possible after the removal of a youth who is at risk of entering foster care placement.

(2) If the minor is detained and the probation officer has reason to believe that the minor is at risk of entering foster care
 placement, as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4, then the probation officer shall conduct, within 30 days, an investigation in order to identify and locate all grandparents, adult siblings, and other relatives of the child, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 319, including any other adult relatives suggested by the parents. The probation officer shall provide to all adult relatives who are located, except when that relative’s history of family or domestic violence makes notification inappropriate, within 30 days of the date on which the child is detained, written notification and shall also, whenever appropriate, provide oral notification, in person or by telephone, of all the following information:

(A) The child has been removed from the custody of the child’s parent or
 parents, or guardians.

(B) An explanation of the various options to participate in the care and placement of the child and support for the child’s family, including any options that may be lost by failing to respond. The notice shall provide information about providing care for the child, how to become a foster family home, approved relative or nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7, or resource family home, and additional services and support that are available in out-of-home placements. The notice shall also include information regarding the Kin-GAP Program (Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9), the CalWORKs program for approved relative caregivers (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9), adoption and adoption assistance (Chapter 2.1 (commencing
 with Section 16115) of Part 4 of Division 9), as well as other options for contact with the child, including, but not limited to, visitation. When oral notification is provided, the probation officer is not required to provide detailed information about the various options to help with the care and placement of the child.

(3) (A) The probation officer shall use due diligence in investigating the names and locations of the relatives, including any parent and alleged parent, pursuant to paragraph (2), including, but not limited to, asking the child in an age-appropriate manner about any parent, alleged parent, and relatives important to the child, consistent with the child’s best interest, and obtaining information regarding the location of the child’s parents, alleged parents, and adult relatives. Each county probation
 department shall do both of the following:

(i) Create and make public a procedure by which a parent and relatives of a child who has been removed from their parents or guardians may identify themselves to the county probation department and be provided with the notices required by paragraphs (1) and (2).

(ii) Notify the State Department of Social Services, on or before January 1, 2024, in an email or other correspondence, whether it has adopted one of the suggested practices for family finding described in All-County Letter 18-42 and, generally, whether the practice has been implemented
 through training, memoranda, manuals, or comparable documents. If a county probation department has not adopted one of the suggested practices for family finding described in All-County Letter 18-42, the county probation department shall provide a copy to the State Department of Social Services of its existing family finding policies and practices, as reflected in memoranda, handbooks, manuals, training manuals, or any other document, that are in existence prior to January 1, 2022.

(B) The due diligence required under subparagraph (A) shall include family finding. For purposes of this section, “family finding” means conducting an investigation, including, but not limited to, through a computer-based search engine, to identify relatives and kin and to connect a child or youth, who may be disconnected from their parents,
 with those relatives and kin in an effort to provide family support and possible placement. If it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, “family finding” also includes contacting the Indian child’s tribe to identify relatives and kin.

(4) To the extent allowed by federal law as a condition of receiving funding under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.), if the probation officer did not conduct the identification and notification of relatives, as required in paragraph (2), but the court orders foster care placement, the probation officer shall conduct the investigation to find and notify relatives within 30 days of the placement order. Nothing in this section shall be construed to delay foster care placement for an individual
 child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 811, Sec. 2.   (SB 384)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

628.1.

If the minor meets one or more of the criteria for detention under Section 628, but the probation officer believes that 24-hour secure detention is not necessary in order to protect the minor or the person or property of another, or to ensure that the minor does not flee the jurisdiction of the court, the probation officer shall proceed according to this section.

Unless one of the conditions described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 628 exists, the probation officer shall release such minor to his or her parent, guardian, or responsible relative on home supervision. As a condition for such release, the probation officer shall require the minor to sign a written promise that he or she understands and will observe the specific conditions of home supervision release. As an additional condition for release, the probation officer also shall require the minor’s parent, guardian, or responsible relative to sign a written promise, translated into a language the parent understands, if necessary, that he or she understands the specific conditions of home supervision release. These conditions may include curfew and school attendance requirements related to the protection of the minor or the person or property of another, or to the minor’s appearances at court hearings. A minor who violates a specific condition of home supervision release which he or she has promised in writing to obey may be taken into custody and placed in secure detention, subject to court review at a detention hearing.

A minor on home supervision shall be entitled to the same legal protections as a minor in secure detention, including a detention hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 996, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

628.2.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Minor” means a person under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602.

(2) “Electronic monitoring” means technology used to identify, track, record, or otherwise monitor a minor’s location or movement through electronic means.

(b) Electronic monitoring devices shall not be used to converse with a minor or to eavesdrop or record any conversation.

(c) A minor shall be entitled to have one day credited against the minor’s maximum term of confinement for each day, or fraction
 thereof, that the minor serves on electronic monitoring. The provision of custody credits pursuant to this subdivision shall apply to custody credits earned beginning January 1, 2023.

(d) If electronic monitoring is imposed for a period greater than 30 days, the court shall hold a hearing no less than once every 30 days to ensure that the minor does not remain on electronic monitoring for an unreasonable length of time. In determining whether a length of time is unreasonable, the court shall consider whether there are less restrictive conditions of release that would achieve the rehabilitative purpose of the juvenile court. If less restrictive conditions of release are warranted, the court shall order removal of the electronic monitor or modify the terms of the electronic monitoring order to achieve the less restrictive alternative.

(e) The Department of Justice shall collect data regarding the use of electronic monitoring, as specified in Section 13012.4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 26.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

629.

(a) As a condition for the release of a minor pursuant to Section 628.1 and subject to Sections 631 and 632, the probation officer shall require the minor to sign, and may also require his or her parent, guardian, or relative to sign, a written promise to appear before the probation officer at the juvenile hall or other suitable place designated by the probation officer at a specified time.

(b) A minor who is 14 years of age or older who is taken into custody by a peace officer for the commission or attempted commission of a felony offense shall not be released until the minor has signed a written promise to appear before the probation officer at the juvenile hall or other suitable place designated by the peace officer, or has been given an order to appear at the juvenile court on a date certain. The peace officer may also require the minor’s parent, guardian, or relative to sign a written promise to appear at the same place designated for the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was amended on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

629.1.

Notwithstanding Section 628 or 628.1, whenever a minor who is 14 years of age or older is delivered to the custody of the probation officer pursuant to Section 626.6, the probation officer shall retain the minor in custody until such time that the minor can be brought before a judicial officer of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 632.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 843, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

630.

(a) If the probation officer determines that the minor shall be retained in custody, he or she shall immediately proceed in accordance with Article 16 (commencing with Section 650) to cause the filing of a petition pursuant to Section 656 with the clerk of the juvenile court who shall set the matter for hearing on the detention calendar. Immediately upon filing the petition with the clerk of the juvenile court, if the minor is alleged to be a person described in Section 601 or 602, the probation officer or the prosecuting attorney shall serve the minor with a copy of the petition and notify him or her of the time and place of the detention hearing. The probation officer or the prosecuting attorney shall notify
 each parent or each guardian of the minor of the time and place of the hearing if the whereabouts of each parent or guardian can be ascertained by due diligence. Notice pursuant to this subdivision may be given orally and shall not be delivered electronically.

(b) In a hearing conducted pursuant to this section, the minor has a privilege against self-incrimination and has a right to confrontation by, and cross-examination of, any person examined by the court as provided in Section 635.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 137.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

630.1.

Upon reasonable notification by counsel representing the minor, his parents or guardian, the clerk of the court shall notify such counsel of the hearings in the manner provided for notice to the parent or guardian of the minor under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 507.)
-------------------------------------------

631.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), whenever a minor is taken into custody by a peace officer or probation officer, except when the minor willfully misrepresents himself or herself as 18 or more years of age, the minor shall be released within 48 hours after having been taken into custody, excluding nonjudicial days, unless within that period of time a petition to declare the minor a ward has been filed pursuant to this chapter or a criminal complaint against the minor has been filed in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Except when the minor represents himself or herself as 18 or more years of age, whenever a minor is taken into custody by a peace officer or probation officer without a warrant on the belief that the minor has committed a misdemeanor that does not involve violence, the threat of violence, or possession or use of a weapon, and if the minor is not currently on probation or parole, the minor shall be released within 48 hours after having been taken into custody , excluding nonjudicial days, unless a petition has been filed to declare the minor to be a ward of the court and the minor has been ordered detained by a judge or referee of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 635. In all cases involving the detention of a minor pursuant to this subdivision, any decision to detain the minor more than 24 hours shall be subject to written review and approval by a probation officer who is a supervisor as soon as possible after it is known that the minor will be detained more than 24 hours. However, if the initial decision to detain the minor more than 24 hours is made by a probation officer who is a supervisor, the decision shall not be subject to review and approval.
